Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.455

Gender equity—Goals.

Institutions of higher education shall strive to accomplish the following goals by June 30, 2002:

(1) Provide the following benefits and services equitably to male and female athletes participating in intercollegiate athletic programs: Equipment and supplies; medical services; services and insurance; transportation and per diem allowances; opportunities to receive coaching and instruction; scholarships and other forms of financial aid; conditioning programs; laundry services; assignment of game officials; opportunities for competition, publicity, and awards; and scheduling of games and practice times, including use of courts, gyms, and pools. Each institution which provides showers, toilets, lockers, or training room facilities for athletic purposes shall provide access to comparable facilities for both males and females.

(2) Provide equitable intercollegiate athletic opportunities for male and female students including opportunities to participate and to receive the benefits of the services listed in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Provide participants with female and male coaches and administrators to act as role models.

[ 1997 c 5 s 1; 1989 c 340 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1997 c 5: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1997." [ 1997 c 5 s 7.]